Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.050

Meetings—Travel expenses of members.

The commission shall meet at least quarterly and shall have such special meetings as may be required. Members of the commission shall receive no additional compensation for their services except that which shall be allowed as travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 120; 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.